Illinois, session 104th, HB681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Government Travel Expense Control Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 150/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Local 8Government Travel Expense Control Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-604, eff. 1-1-17.)